Maryland, session 2025, HB0480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–506.
(a) (1) Except as provided in [paragraphs] PARAGRAPH (2) [and (3)] of this
subsection, before a county governing body may adopt a county plan or a revision or
amendment to the county plan:
(i) The county governing body shall submit the county plan,
revision, or amendment to each official planning agency that has jurisdiction in the county,
including any comprehensive planning agency with areawide jurisdiction, for review and
comment within a 30–day period for consistency with planning programs for the area; and
(ii) The county planning agency shall certify that the plan, revision,
or amendment is consistent with the county comprehensive plan prepared under Title 1,
Subtitle 4 or Title 3 of the Land Use Article or § 10–324 of the Local Government Article.
(2) In Montgomery County and Prince George’s County, the review and
comments of the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission in accordance
with § 9–516 of this subtitle constitute full compliance with the requirement for review by
an official planning agency under this subsection.
– 1 –

Ch. 598 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(3) (i) This paragraph applies only in St. Mary’s County.
(ii) A new public sewerage system or an expansion of an existing
public sewerage system, or a new water supply system or an expansion of an existing water
supply system, may not be allowed in St. Mary’s County unless the adoption, revision, or
amendment to the county plan containing the public sewerage system or water supply
system:
1. Is reviewed by the St. Mary’s County Planning
Commission in conformity with the provisions of this paragraph; and
2. Is approved by the Board of County Commissioners or,
subject to subparagraph (v) of this paragraph, the Commissioners’ designee.
(iii) 1. The County Commissioners or the Commissioners’
designee may not approve the adoption, revision, or amendment of the county plan that
contains a new public sewerage system or an expansion of an existing public sewerage
system, or a new water supply system or an expansion of an existing water supply system,
until the Planning Commission:
A. Conducts a complete review of the county plan; and
B. Holds, or arranges to be held, at least one public hearing
on the county plan.
2. The Planning Commission may delegate the responsibility
of holding a public hearing under this subparagraph to county staff as directed by the
County Commissioners.
(iv) In its review and recommendation to the County Commissioners
or the Commissioners’ designee, the St. Mary’s County Planning Commission shall consider
and make specific findings of fact with respect to the following objectives and policies of the
county plan that contains a new public sewerage system or an expansion of an existing
public sewerage system, or a new water supply system or an expansion of an existing water
supply system:
1. Compatibility with the Comprehensive Land Use Plan;
2. Planning and zoning issues;
3. Population estimates;
4. Engineering;
5. Economics;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 598
6. State, regional, and municipal plans; and
7. Comments received from other agencies in the county.
(v) The County Commissioners may only appoint a designee under
this subsection for purposes of considering amendments to the county plan containing a
public sewerage system or water supply system in growth areas shown on an adopted
Comprehensive Land Use Plan.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –